Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.60.010

Conduct of elections—Canvass.

All elections, whether special or general, held under RCW 29A.04.321 and 29A.04.330 must be conducted by the county auditor as ex officio county supervisor of elections and, except as provided in RCW 29A.60.240, the returns canvassed by the county canvassing board.

[ 2013 c 11 s 59; 2003 c 111 s 1501; 1965 c 123 s 4; 1965 c 9 s 29.13.040. Prior: 1963 c 200 s 6; 1955 c 55 s 3; 1951 c 257 s 4; 1951 c 101 s 4; 1949 c 161 s 5; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 5153-1. Formerly RCW 29.13.040.]